North Dakota, session 69, SB2111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-07 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. When the court imposes probation upon conviction for a felony offense subject to
section 12.1-32-09.1 or 12.1-32-02.1, a second or subsequent violation of section
12.1-17-07.1, a second or subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection
order, a violation of chapter 12.1-41, a violation of section 14-09-22, or a felony
offense under chapter 39-08, the court shall place the defendant under the supervision
and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. When the court
imposes probation upon conviction or order of disposition in all other felony cases, the
court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of the
department of corrections and rehabilitation. In class A misdemeanor cases, the court
may place the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation or other responsible party. In all otherclass B
misdemeanor cases in which the court orders supervision, the court only may place
the defendant under the supervision and management of a community corrections
program other than the department of corrections and rehabilitation. A community
corrections program means a program for the supervision of a defendant, including
monitoring and enforcement of terms and conditions of probation set by the court.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 54-23.3-01.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.8058.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. "Offender" means a person who has been committed to the legal and physical custody
of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, or placed under the supervision
and management of the department by a district court, by the parole board, or through
the interstate compact for the supervision of adult offenders. The term does not
include a person convicted of a class B misdemeanor.
Page No. 2 25.8058.01000